Alaska statutes. Title 8. Business and Professions.
Article 2. Licensing.

Administrative Code. —

For license renewal and continuing education, see 12 AAC 18, art. 2.

Sec. 08.95.100.
License required.

A person who practices clinical social work without obtaining a license under this chapter to practice clinical social work is guilty of a class B misdemeanor unless the person is

licensed under a provision of this title that is outside this chapter, is practicing within the scope of that license, and is not representing to the public by title or description of service as being engaged in the practice of clinical social work; or

practicing clinical social work as a student in a social work program approved by the board.

A person is guilty of a class B misdemeanor if the person is not licensed

under this chapter and uses the title “social worker” unless the person is exempt from licensure under AS

08.95.911

;

as a clinical social worker under this chapter or has a clinical social worker license that is suspended, revoked, or lapsed, and the person

uses in connection with the person’s name the words or letters “L.C.S.W.,” “Licensed Clinical Social Worker,” or other letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a licensed clinical social worker; or

in any way, orally or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as a licensed clinical social worker;

as a master social worker under this chapter or has a master social worker license that is suspended, revoked, or lapsed, and the person

uses in connection with the person’s name the words or letters “L.M.S.W.,” “Licensed Master Social Worker,” or other letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a licensed master social worker; or

in any way, orally or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as being a licensed master social worker; or

as a baccalaureate social worker under this chapter or has a baccalaureate social worker license that is suspended, revoked, or lapsed, and the person

uses in connection with the person’s name the words or letters “L.B.S.W.,” “Licensed Baccalaureate Social Worker,” or other letters, words, or insignia indicating or implying that the person is a licensed baccalaureate social worker; or

in any way, orally or in writing, directly or by implication, holds out as being a licensed baccalaureate social worker.

[Repealed, § 26 ch 118 SLA 1998.]

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am §§ 10, 11, 26 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Sec. 08.95.110.
License requirements.

The board shall issue a license to practice clinical social work to a person who

has received a master’s degree or a doctoral degree in social work from a college or university approved by the board;

has completed, within the 10 years before application for licensure and under the supervision of a licensed clinical social worker, licensed psychologist, or licensed psychiatrist either

a minimum of two years of continuous full-time employment in postgraduate clinical social work; or

a minimum of 3,000 hours of less than full-time employment in a period of not less than two years in postgraduate clinical social work;

is of good moral character;

is in good professional standing and is fit to practice social work as determined by the board;

has provided three professional references that are acceptable to the board, including, if the applicant

was previously employed to practice social work, one reference from a person who was the applicant’s employer while practicing social work unless the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant is unable to satisfy the requirement of this subparagraph through no fault of the applicant; and

is currently employed to practice social work, a reference from the applicant’s current employer;

has satisfactorily completed the examination given by the board for clinical social worker licensing; and

has paid required fees.

The board shall issue a license authorizing use of the title “master social worker” to a person who

satisfies the requirements of (a)(1), (3) — (5), and (7) of this section; and

has satisfactorily completed the examination given by the board for master social worker licensing.

The board shall issue a license authorizing use of the title “baccalaureate social worker” to a person who

satisfies the requirements of (a)(3) — (5) and (7) of this section;

has received a bachelor’s degree in social work from a college or university approved by the board; and

has satisfactorily completed the examination given by the board for baccalaureate social worker licensing.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am §§ 12, 13 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Cross references. —

For transitional licensing provisions valid until July 1, 2000, see § 28, ch. 118, SLA 1998 in the 1998 Temporary and Special Acts.

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and employment requirements, see 12 AAC 18, art. 1.

Sec. 08.95.120.
Licensing by credentials.

The board shall issue a license to practice clinical social work if the applicant

holds a current license to practice clinical social work in another jurisdiction that, at the time of original issuance of the license, had requirements for licensure equal to or more stringent than those of this state;

is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or disciplinary action before a regulatory authority or a professional social work association;

has provided three professional references that are acceptable to the board, including, if the applicant

was previously employed to practice social work, one reference from a person who was the applicant’s employer while practicing social work unless the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant is unable to satisfy the requirement of this subparagraph through no fault of the applicant; and

is currently employed to practice social work, a reference from the applicant’s current employer;

has not had a license to practice clinical social work revoked, suspended, or surrendered in lieu of disciplinary action in this state or another jurisdiction;

has submitted proof of continued competency satisfactory to the board; and

has paid required fees.

The board shall issue a license to use the title “master social worker” or “baccalaureate social worker,” as applicable, to an applicant who

holds a current similar license from another jurisdiction that, at the time of original issuance of the license, had requirements for the license that were equal to or more stringent than those of this state;

is not the subject of an unresolved complaint or disciplinary action before a regulatory authority or a professional social work association;

has provided three professional references that are acceptable to the board, including, if the applicant

was previously employed to practice social work, one reference from a person who was the applicant’s employer while practicing social work unless the applicant demonstrates to the satisfaction of the board that the applicant is unable to satisfy the requirement of this subparagraph through no fault of the applicant; and

is currently employed to practice social work, a reference from the applicant’s current employer;

has not had a license to practice social work or to use the title “social worker” revoked, suspended, or surrendered in lieu of disciplinary action in this state or another jurisdiction;

has submitted proof of continued competency satisfactory to the board; and

has paid required fees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988; am §§ 14, 15 ch 118 SLA 1998)

Administrative Code. —

For occupational licensing fees, see 12 AAC 2, art. 2.

For application and employment requirements, see 12 AAC 18, art. 1.

Sec. 08.95.125.
Temporary license to practice social work.

On receipt of a completed application for a social worker license, a request for a temporary license, and payment of the application fee and temporary license fee determined under AS

08.01.065(c)

, the board, a member of the board, or an employee of the department designated by the board may issue a temporary license

to use the title “master social worker” to an individual who

satisfies the requirements of AS

08.95.110(a)(1)

and (3); or

satisfies the requirements of AS

08.95.120(a)(2)

and (4) and provides a photocopy, together with a sworn statement as to the copy’s veracity, of the applicant’s current license as a master social worker in another jurisdiction;

to use the title “baccalaureate social worker” to an individual who

satisfies the requirements of AS

08.95.110(a)(3)

and (c)(2); or

satisfies the requirements of AS

08.95.120(a)(2)

and (4) and provides a photocopy, together with a sworn statement as to the copy’s veracity, of the applicant’s current license as a baccalaureate social worker in another jurisdiction.

A temporary license provided to an applicant under (a)(1)(A) or (a)(2)(A) of this section is valid for one year and is valid notwithstanding the applicant’s failure to satisfactorily complete the examination required under AS

08.95.110(a)(6)

during the period that the license is valid.

A temporary license issued under (a)(1)(B) or (a)(2)(B) of this section is valid for one year.

An individual’s temporary license becomes invalid, notwithstanding (b) and (c) of this section, if the individual’s application for a permanent license under AS

08.95.110

or

08.95.120

is rejected by the board. The temporary license becomes invalid on the date of board action rejecting the license application.

The board

may impose by regulation additional limitations that it determines appropriate on a temporary license issued under this section;

may not, under this section, issue more than one temporary license to an applicant;

may not renew a temporary license.

History.

(§ 1 ch 37 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For temporary courtesy license, see AS

08.01.062

.

Sec. 08.95.130.
Display of license.

A person licensed under this chapter shall display the license in a conspicuous place where the licensee practices.

History.

(§ 2 ch 126 SLA 1988)